Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.121

On-site revocation hearing—Procedure when waived.

(1) For offenders convicted of crimes committed before July 1, 1984, within fifteen days from the date of notice to the department of corrections of the arrest and detention of the alleged parole violator, he or she shall be personally served by a state community corrections officer with a copy of the factual allegations of the violation of the conditions of parole, and, at the same time shall be advised of his or her right to an on-site parole revocation hearing and of his or her rights and privileges as provided in RCW 9.95.120 through 9.95.126. The alleged parole violator, after service of the allegations of violations of the conditions of parole and the advice of rights may waive the on-site parole revocation hearing as provided in RCW 9.95.120, and admit one or more of the alleged violations of the conditions of parole. If the board accepts the waiver it shall either, (a) reinstate the parolee on parole under the same or modified conditions, or (b) revoke the parole of the parolee and enter an order of parole revocation and return to state custody. A determination of a new minimum sentence shall be made within thirty days of return to state custody which shall not exceed the maximum sentence as provided by law for the crime of which the parolee was originally convicted or the maximum fixed by the court.

If the waiver made by the parolee is rejected by the board it shall hold an on-site parole revocation hearing under the provisions of RCW 9.95.120 through 9.95.126.

(2) Offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 are subject to the violation hearing process established in RCW 9.95.435.

[ 2009 c 28 s 27; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 334; 1981 c 136 s 38; 1979 c 141 s 3; 1969 c 98 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Severability—Effective date—1969 c 98: See notes following RCW 9.95.120.